Washington statutes.
RCW 36.145.040

Public hearing on petition—Notice requirements.

Notice of all public hearings must include a description of the proposal, be mailed to all petitioners, and must be published once a week for three consecutive weeks in the official paper for each applicable legislative authority, prior to the date set for the hearing. The notice must be posted for not less than fifteen days prior to the date of the hearing in each of three public places within the boundaries of the proposed district and in three public places for each applicable legislative authority. Each notice must contain the time, date, and place of the public hearing.

[ 2010 c 7 s 203.]